Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3312
Practice of veterinary medicine and surgery, defined.

Practice of veterinary medicine and surgery means:

(1) To diagnose, treat, correct, change, relieve, or prevent animal disease, deformity, defect, injury, or other physical or mental conditions, including the prescription or administration of any drug, medicine, biologic, apparatus, application, anesthetic, or other therapeutic or diagnostic substance or technique, and the use of any manual or mechanical procedure for testing for pregnancy or fertility or for correcting sterility or infertility. The acts described in this subdivision shall not be done without a valid veterinarian-client-patient relationship;

(2) To render advice or recommendation with regard to any act described in subdivision (1) of this section;

(3) To represent, directly or indirectly, publicly or privately, an ability and willingness to do any act described in subdivision (1) of this section; and

(4) To use any title, words, abbreviation, or letters in a manner or under circumstances which induce the belief that the person using them is qualified to do any act described in subdivision (1) of this section.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1094.